es: Bricolaje > Accesorios para herramientas > Bases para herramientas: Bases para sierras
bg-BG: Железария > Аксесоари за инструменти > Стойки за инструменти: Стойки за триони
en: Hardware > Tool Accessories > Tool Stands: Saw Stands
nb: Maskinvare > Verktøytilbehør > Verktøystativer: Sagstativer
ro-RO: Feronerie > Accesorii pentru unelte > Suporturi pentru scule: Suporturi pentru ferăstraie
fr: Quincaillerie > Accessoires d’outils > Supports pour outils: Supports pour scies
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Werkzeugzubehör > Werkzeugständer: Sägeständer
hr-HR: Željezarija > Dodaci za alat > Stalci za alat: Stalci za pile
ko: 철물 > 공구 부대용품 > 공구 스탠드: 톱 스탠드
tr: Hırdavat > Alet Aksesuarları > Alet Stantları: Testere Stantları
hu: Hardver > Szerszám-kiegészítők > Szerszámállványok: Fűrészállványok
sk-SK: Náradie > Náradie a príslušenstvo > Stojany na náradie: Stojany na píly
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Gereedschapaccessoires > Gereedschapstandaarden: Zaagstandaarden
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Nástroje a nářadí – příslušenství > Pracovní stojany: Pilové stojany
da: Isenkram > Værktøj – tilbehør > Værktøjsholdere: Savholdere
zh-TW: 硬體 > 工具配件 > 工具腳架: 鋸檯
fi: Rakentaminen > Työkalujen lisätarvikkeet > Työkalutelineet: Sahatelineet
pt-BR: Ferragens > Acessórios para ferramentas > Suportes para ferramentas: Suportes para serras
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Accessori per attrezzi > Supporti per attrezzi: Supporti per seghe
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Αξεσουάρ εργαλείων > Βάσεις εργαλείων: Βάσεις πριονιών
pl: Sprzęt > Akcesoria do narzędzi > Stojaki na narzędzia: Stojaki na piły
sv: Metallprodukter > Verktygstillbehör > Verktygsställ: Sågställ
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Įrankių priedai > Įrankių stovai: Pjūklų stovai
pt-PT: Equipamento > Acessórios de ferramentas > Apoios de ferramentas: Suportes de serras
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Dodatki za orodje > Stojala za orodje: Stojala za žage
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 工具配件 > 工具台: 锯台
ja: DIY用品 > 工具関連用品 > 工具スタンド: のこぎりスタンド
vi: Phần cứng > Phụ kiện dụng cụ > Giá để dụng cụ: Cưa xẻ bàn
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > อุปกรณ์เครื่องมือ > ที่ตั้งเครื่องมือ: ที่ตั้งเลื่อย
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Аксессуары для инструментов > Подставки и столы для инструментов: Столы для пил и пильных станков